Florida, session 2026, HB1029.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
34
35 Section 1. This act may be cited as "The Motherhood
36 Initiative."
37 Section 2. Section 383.012, Florida Statutes, is created
38 to read:
39 383.012 Home visit program for expectant mothers.—
40 (1) The Department of Health shall expand the current home
41 visit program to include a home visit program for expectant
42 mothers within the Healthy Start program, which shall include
43 Healthy Start Care Coordination Programs.
44 (2) The program shall:
45 (a)1. Conduct screenings for expectant mothers for
46 depression and substance abuse disorders provided by a
47 registered nurse, or licensed practical nurse licensed under
48 part I of chapter 464.
49 2. The department shall refer at-risk expectant mothers
50 for mental health treatment.
Page 2 of 8
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1029-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1029 2026
51 (b) Ensure an expectant mother is monitoring her blood
52 pressure and shall provide and review the educational materials
53 created under s. 383.55(3) with the expectant mother.
54 (c) Include a 3 hour course on the care of a newborn
55 including, but not limited to, bathing, dressing, and feeding;
56 cardiopulmonary resuscitation; and setting up sleep routines for
57 the newborn and the mother that hospitals and birth centers
58 shall offer to a mother before going home with her newborn.
59 (3) Health insurance providers and Medicaid shall provide
60 coverage for the program, as applicable.
61 Section 3. Subsection (1) of section 383.305, Florida
62 Statutes, is amended to read:
63 383.305 Licensure; fees.—
64 (1) In accordance with s. 408.805, an applicant or a
65 licensee shall pay a fee for each license application submitted
66 under ss. 383.30-383.332 and part II of chapter 408. The amount
67 of the fee shall be established by rule. The Agency for Health
68 Care Administration may reduce the fees for an applicant or
69 licensee under this section for birthing centers in rural and
70 other medically underserved areas.
71 Section 4. Section 383.31, Florida Statutes, is amended to
72 read:
73 383.31 Selection of clients; Informed consent.—
74 (1)(a) A birth center may accept only those patients who
75 are expected to have normal pregnancies, labors, and deliveries.
Page 3 of 8
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1029-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1029 2026
76 (1)(b) The criteria for the selection of clients and the
77 establishment of risk status shall be defined by rule of the
78 agency.
79 (2)(a) A patient may not be accepted for care at a birth
80 center until the patient has signed a client informed-consent
81 form.
82 (b) The agency shall develop a client informed-consent
83 form to be used by the center to inform the client of the
84 benefits and risks related to childbirth outside a hospital.
85 Section 5. Section 383.55, Florida Statutes, is created to
86 read:
87 383.55 Coverage of blood pressure monitors and cuffs.—
88 (1) As used in this section, the term "blood pressure
89 monitor and cuff" means a device designed for the purpose of
90 aiding in the treatment of hypertension by measuring blood
91 pressure levels through a validated blood pressure measurement
92 device at home or elsewhere outside of the clinic setting.
93 (2) The Department of Health must provide a blood pressure
94 monitor and cuff for an expectant mother to monitor for
95 preeclampsia and must provide any necessary repairs or
96 replacement parts for the blood pressure monitor and cuff.
97 (3) The department shall create educational materials on
98 the use of the blood pressure monitor and cuff, including, but
99 not limited to, the proper use of the blood pressure monitor and
100 cuff and the urgent maternal warning signs and symptoms provided
Page 4 of 8
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1029-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1029 2026
101 by the Hear Her campaign of the United States Centers for
102 Disease Control and Prevention.
103 Section 6. Section 395.3043, Florida Statutes, is created
104 to read:
105 395.3043 Doula and midwife services.—
106 (1) As used in this section, the term:
107 (a) "Doula" means a nonmedical professional who provides
108 physical, emotional, and informational support to individuals
109 and families before, during, and after childbirth.
110 (b) "Midwife" has the same definition as in s. 467.003.
111 (2) A doula or midwife may be present with his or her
112 client during childbirth inside of a hospital.
113 Section 7. Section 395.6071, Florida Statutes, is created
114 to read:
115 395.6071 Doula and midwife services.—
116 (1) As used in this section, the term:
117 (a) "Doula" means a nonmedical professional who provides
118 physical, emotional, and informational support to individuals
119 and families before, during, and after childbirth.
120 (b) "Midwife" has the same definition as in s. 467.003.
121 (2) A doula or midwife may be present with his or her
122 client during childbirth inside of a rural hospital.
123 Section 8. Section 402.822, Florida Statutes, is created
124 to read:
125 402.822 Twenty-four hour early learning centers.—The
Page 5 of 8
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1029-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1029 2026
126 Department of Children and Families shall provide incentives for
127 early learning centers to remain open 24 hours for the children
128 of first responders, health care practitioners, and people of
129 other industries who work nontraditional hours. Incentives for
130 child care facilities may include, but need not be limited to:
131 (1) Raising subsidy rates for child care outside of
132 traditional hours.
133 (2) Authorizing local agencies to restructure their
134 subsidy systems.
135 (3) Authorizing counties to create contract nontraditional
136 hours slots for child care providers or to create shared service
137 agreements.
138 Section 9. Section 458.355, Florida Statutes, is created
139 to read:
140 458.355 Continuing education; Medicaid payment
141 information.—The continuing education requirements prescribed by
142 the board for a physician under this chapter or chapter 459 must
143 include education on the mandatory Medicaid payments for a
144 pregnant woman for the duration of her pregnancy and for the
145 postpartum period consisting of the 12-month period beginning on
146 the last day of her pregnancy.
147 Section 10. Section 459.075, Florida Statutes, is created
148 to read:
149 459.075 Continuing education; Medicaid payment
150 information.—The continuing education requirements prescribed by
Page 6 of 8
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1029-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1029 2026
151 the board for a physician under this chapter, or chapter 458
152 must include education on the mandatory Medicaid payments for a
153 pregnant woman for the duration of her pregnancy and for the
154 postpartum period consisting of the 12-month period beginning on
155 the last day of her pregnancy.
156 Section 11. Subsection (15) of section 1002.83, Florida
157 Statutes, is amended to read:
158 1002.83 Early learning coalitions.—
159 (15)(a) Each school district shall, upon request of the
160 coalition, make a list of all individuals currently eligible to
161 act as a substitute teacher within the school district, pursuant
162 to rules adopted by the school district pursuant to s. 1012.35,
163 available to an early learning coalition serving students within
164 the school district.
165 (b) Child care facilities as defined in s. 402.302 may
166 employ individuals listed as substitute instructors for the
167 purpose of offering the school readiness program, the Voluntary
168 Prekindergarten Education Program, and all other legally
169 operating child care programs.
170 1. Child care facilities that receive support from early
171 learning coalitions shall be called early learning centers.
172 2. The Department of Education will ensure appropriate
173 instruction and pacing of an approved curriculum for each early
174 learning center.
175 Section 12. Paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of section
Page 7 of 8
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1029-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1029 2026
176 1003.21, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
177 1003.21 School attendance.—
178 (1)(a)1. All children who have attained the age of 5 6
179 years or who will have attained the age of 5 6 years by February
180 1 of any school year or who are older than 5 6 years of age but
181 who have not attained the age of 16 years, except as otherwise
182 provided, are required to attend school regularly during the
183 entire school term.
184 2. Children who will have attained the age of 5 years on
185 or before September 1 of the school year are eligible for
186 admission to public kindergartens during that school year under
187 rules adopted by the district school board.
188 Section 13. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 8 of 8
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1029-00